Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB957.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Blood Transparency and Patient Rights Act.Section 2. Legislative findings and intent.The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) Patients have a fundamental right to make informed decisions regarding their health care, including the blood used in transfusions.(2) Transparency regarding blood donor information, including vaccination status, enhances patient trust and autonomy.(3) This act balances the need for disclosure with the continued safety and availability of the Commonwealth's blood 12345678910111213141516171819 supply.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Autologous blood." Blood donated and stored for later transfusion to the same individual."Blood provider." A licensed entity, organization or institution that collects, stores, processes, distributes or supplies human blood or blood components for transfusion purposes, including, but not limited to, blood banks, blood centers and hospital-based transfusion services."Directed donation." A blood donation made by a specifically designated individual for transfusion to a named recipient."Informed consent." A voluntary agreement to a medical procedure after full disclosure of relevant facts, including the vaccination status of blood used in transfusions."Medical facility." A hospital, clinic, ambulatory surgical center, outpatient care center or other health care institution licensed by the Commonwealth to provide medical treatment, including procedures involving blood transfusions."Provider." A licensed physician, nurse or other health care professional authorized to perform or supervise medical procedures, including the administration of blood transfusions, within the scope of their professional practice."Vaccination status." The record of whether a blood donor has received any vaccines, including, but not limited to, COVID-19 or mRNA-based vaccines.Section 4. Patient rights to blood selection.(a) Right to autologous blood.--A patient may elect to 20250SB0957PN1086 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 donate and use their own blood for medical procedures, subject to medical viability and institutional storage capabilities.(b) Right to directed donation.--A patient may designate one or more individuals to donate blood specifically for the patient's use, subject to blood type compatibility and infectious disease screening.Section 5. Disclosure of vaccination status.(a) Disclosure.--Upon request, a medical facility or blood provider shall disclose to a patient the vaccination status of any blood available for transfusion.(b) Method of disclosure.--Vaccination status may be disclosed by category and shall be included as part of the patient's pretransfusion informed consent documentation.Section 6. Informed consent requirements.(a) Blood transfusion disclosure.--Except as provided in subsection (b) and subject to section 504 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, informed consent shall include disclosure of the vaccination status of the blood to be used, when known, and the option to decline transfusion based on the information.(b) Exception.--In a life-threatening emergency where the patient or the patient's legal representative is unable to provide consent, licensed medical personnel may proceed with transfusion regardless of vaccination status.(c) Immunity.--A provider acting in good faith under subsection (a) shall be immune from civil or criminal liability related to the donor vaccination status of transfused blood.Section 7. Regulations.The Department of Health shall promulgate regulations to 20250SB0957PN1086 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implement the provisions of this act, including procedures for:(1) Standardized informed consent forms.(2) Safe accommodation of directed and autologous donations.(3) Public education on blood transfusion options.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0957PN1086 - 4 - 1234567